Mississippi statutes. Title 91. Trusts and Estates
Article 1. Trusts — General Provisions.

§§ 91-9-1 through 91-9-9.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 105, effective from and after July 1, 2014.

§91-9-1. [Codes, 1857, ch. 44, art. 5; 1871, § 2896; 1880, § 1296; 1892, § 4230; 1906, § 4780; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3124; 1930, § 3348; 1942, § 269; Laws, 1993, ch. 507, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1993.]

§91-9-2. [Laws, 2002, ch. 393, § 1; Laws, 2003, ch. 442, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2003.]

§91-9-3. [Codes, 1857, ch. 44, art. 6; 1871, § 2897; 1880, § 1297; 1892, § 4231; 1906, § 4781; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3125; 1930, § 3349; 1942, § 270; Laws, 1993, ch. 507, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1993.]

§91-9-5. [Codes, 1942, § 1273-10; Laws, 1960, ch. 217, § 10; Laws, 1996, ch. 400, § 44, eff from and after passage (approved March 19, 1996).]

§91-9-7. [Laws, 1993, ch. 507, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 425, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2001.]

§91-9-9. [Laws, 1994, ch. 589, § 1; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1999, ch. 374, § 3; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2002, ch. 613 , § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 474, § 18; Laws, 2008, ch. 452, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 8, 2008.)]